Utah statutes.
42-2-8.   Expiration of filing -- Notice -- Removal from active index.

A filing under this chapter shall be effective for a period of three years from the date of filing.  At the expiration of that period, if no new filing is made by or on behalf of the person who made the original filing, the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall send a notice by regular mail, postage prepaid, to the address shown in the filing indicating that it has expired.  If no new filing is made within 30 days after the date of mailing the notice, the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall remove the name from the active alphabetical index, and place it on a permanent inactive alphabetical index.

